Florida, session 2026, SB1006.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 46 47 Section 1.âSection 1002.206, Florida Statutes, is amended 48 to read: 49 1002.206âFreedom of speech and religious expression in 50 public schools.â 51 (1)âThis section may be cited as the âFlorida Student and 52 School Personnel First Amendment and Religious Liberties Act.â 53 (2)âA school district may not discriminate against a 54 student, parent, or school personnel on the basis of a religious 55 viewpoint or religious expression. A school district may not 56 discriminate against or penalize a student on the basis of 57 expressing a religious, political, or ideological viewpoint or 58 for engaging in religious, political, or ideological expression 59 in the same time, place, and manner and to the same extent that 60 other similarly situated students may engage in speech or 61 express views at a public school. A school district shall treat 62 a studentâs voluntary expression of a religious, political, or 63 ideological viewpoint on an otherwise permissible subject in the 64 same manner that the school district treats a studentâs 65 voluntary expression of any other a secular viewpoint. 66 (3)(a)âA student may express his or her religious, 67 political, or ideological beliefs in coursework, artwork, and 68 other written and oral assignments free from discrimination or 69 academic penalty. A studentâs homework and classroom assignments 70 must shall be evaluated, regardless of their religious, 71 political, or ideological content, based on expected academic 72 standards relating to the course curriculum and requirements. A 73 student may not be penalized or rewarded based on the religious, 74 political, or ideological content of his or her work if the 75 coursework, artwork, or other written or oral assignments 76 require a studentâs viewpoint to be expressed. 77 (b)âA student may wear clothing, accessories, and jewelry 78 that display a religious, political, or ideological message or 79 symbol in the same manner and to the same extent that other 80 secular types of clothing, accessories, and jewelry that display 81 messages or symbols are permitted to be worn. 82 (4)(a)âA student may pray or engage in or organize 83 religious, political, or ideological activities or religious, 84 political, or ideological expression before, during, and after 85 the school day in the same manner and to the same extent that a 86 student may engage in other secular activities or expression. A 87 student may organize prayer groups or, religious, political, or 88 ideological clubs, and other religious, political, or 89 ideological gatherings before, during, and after the school day 90 in the same manner and to the same extent that a student is 91 permitted to organize other secular activities, clubs, 92 gatherings, and groups. A school district may not discriminate 93 against a student club or group based on: 94 1.âThe religious, political, or ideological viewpoints 95 expressed by the students or the club; or 96 2.âAny requirement that the leaders or members of the club 97 affirm and adhere to the clubâs sincerely held beliefs, comply 98 with the clubâs standards of conduct, or further the clubâs 99 mission or purpose, as defined by the student club. 100 (b)1.âA school district may not prevent school personnel 101 from participating in religious activities on school grounds 102 that are initiated by students at reasonable times before or 103 after the school day if such activities are voluntary and do not 104 conflict with the responsibilities or assignments of such 105 personnel. 106 2.âA school district shall comply with the federal 107 requirements in Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, which 108 prohibits an employer from discriminating against an employee on 109 the basis of religion. 110 (c)âA school district shall give a religious, political, or 111 ideological group access to the same school facilities for 112 assembling as given to other secular groups without 113 discrimination based on the religious, political, or ideological 114 content of the groupâs expression. A group that meets for prayer 115 or other religious, political, or ideological speech may 116 advertise or announce its meetings in the same manner and to the 117 same extent that another a secular group may advertise or 118 announce its meetings. 119 (5)(a)âA school district shall adopt a policy that 120 establishes a limited public forum for student speakers at any 121 school event at which a student is to speak publicly. The 122 limited public forum policy shall require the school district 123 to: 124 1.âProvide the forum in a manner that does not discriminate 125 against a studentâs voluntary expression of a religious, 126 political, or ideological viewpoint on an otherwise permissible 127 subject; 128 2.âProvide a method based on neutral criteria for the 129 selection of student speakers at school events, activities, and 130 graduation ceremonies; 131 3.âEnsure that a student speaker does not engage in 132 obscene, vulgar, offensively lewd, or indecent speech; and 133 4.âState in written or oral form that the studentâs speech 134 does not reflect the endorsement, sponsorship, position, or 135 expression of the school district. 136 (b)âThe school district shall deliver the disclaimer 137 required in subparagraph (a)4. at all graduation events and any 138 other event at which a student speaks publicly. 139 (c)âStudent expression of a religious, political, or 140 ideological viewpoint on an otherwise permissible subject may 141 not be excluded from the limited public forum. 142 (6)âThe Department of Education shall develop a model 143 policy regarding a limited public forum and voluntary expression 144 of religious, political, or ideological viewpoints by students 145 and school personnel in public schools pursuant to this section. 146 The department shall publish the model policy on its website. 147 Each district school board shall adopt and implement the 148 departmentâs model policy. 149 (7)âThis section does not prevent a school district from 150 prohibiting, limiting, or restricting: 151 (a)âExpression that the First Amendment of the United 152 States Constitution does not protect. 153 (b)âExpression that is unwelcome, and so severe, pervasive, 154 and subjectively and objectively offensive, that a student is 155 effectively denied equal access to educational opportunities or 156 benefits provided by the school. 157 (c)âConduct that intentionally, materially, and 158 substantially disrupts: 159 1.âThe operations of the school; or 160 2.âThe expressive activities of another person if that 161 activity is occurring on campus in a space reserved for that 162 activity under the exclusive use or control of a particular 163 student, group of students, or group or club. 164 (8)(a)âAny person or student club or group that is harmed 165 by a violation of this section, or whose rights under this 166 section are violated, shall have a private cause of action 167 against the school district for declaratory and injunctive 168 relief, statutory punitive damages, reasonable attorney fees and 169 costs, and any other appropriate relief. 170 (b)âIf a person or student club or group prevails in any 171 such action, the person or student club or group must be awarded 172 statutory punitive damages in an amount of at least $15,000, not 173 to exceed $25,000. 174 (c)âAny person or student club or group aggrieved by a 175 violation of this section may assert such violation as a defense 176 or counterclaim in any disciplinary action or in any civil or 177 administrative proceedings brought against such person or 178 student club or group. 179 (d)âNothing in this section may be interpreted to limit any 180 other remedies available to any student or student club or 181 group. 182 (e)âA person or student club or group must bring suit for 183 violation of this section not later than 2 years after the day 184 the cause of action accrues. For purposes of calculating the 2 185 year limitation period, each day that the violation persists, 186 and each day that a policy in violation of this section remains 187 in effect, constitutes a new day that the cause of action has 188 accrued. 189 (9)(a)âA school district that violates this section is not 190 immune from suit or liability for such violation and is not 191 immune from civil suit in federal court. 192 (b)âThe state waives immunity under the Eleventh Amendment 193 of the United States Constitution and consents to suit in a 194 federal court for lawsuits arising out of this section. A school 195 that violates this section is not immune from suit or liability 196 for the violation. 197 (10)âIf any provision of this section or its application to 198 any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does 199 not affect other provisions or applications of this section 200 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or 201 application, and to this end the provisions of this act are 202 severable. 203 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.